Utah statutes.
59-1-903.   Duties.

(1)  The review commission shall:

(a)  establish an ongoing and comprehensive review of:

(i)  the tax laws of this state and the political subdivisions of this state; and

(ii)  all issues related to revenue and taxation; and

(b)  make recommendations to the governor and the Legislature on:

(i)  specific tax issues; and

(ii)  tax policy of the state and the political subdivisions.

(2)  The review commission may advise the governor, the Legislature, and political subdivisions on any proposed change of tax laws or tax policy.

